Florida, session 2026, SB356.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âSection 316.21275, Florida Statutes, is created 26 to read: 27 316.21275âOperation of a UTV on certain roadways.â 28 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 29 (a)ââDirect supervisionâ means a person is in the adjacent 30 front passenger seat of the UTV being operated. 31 (b)ââUtility terrain vehicleâ or âUTVâ means a vehicle less 32 than 70 inches in width which has at least two seats allowing 33 passengers to sit in a side-by-side manner, is operated by foot 34 controls and a steering wheel, and is equipped with headlamps, 35 stop lamps, turn signals, tail lamps, rearview mirrors, a 36 windshield, seat belts, and a horn. 37 (2)âA UTV may be operated during all hours. 38 (3)âA UTV may be operated only upon: 39 (a)âA two-lane county road with a posted speed limit of 40 less than 55 miles per hour which has been designated for UTV 41 use by a county; or 42 (b)âA two-lane municipal street with a posted speed limit 43 of less than 55 miles per hour which has been designated for UTV 44 use by a municipality. 45 46 Before making such designation, the responsible county or 47 municipality must first determine that a UTV may safely travel 48 on or cross the public road or street, considering factors 49 including the speed, volume, and character of motor vehicle 50 traffic using the road or street. 51 (4)âA person may operate a UTV on the State Highway System 52 only when necessary to cross the highway at an angle of 53 approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the roadway and at 54 a place where a quick and safe crossing can be made. The 55 Department of Transportation may prohibit the operation of UTVs 56 on any road in its jurisdiction if it determines that such 57 prohibition is necessary in the interest of safety. 58 (5)âA person may operate a UTV only if he or she possesses 59 a driver license pursuant to s. 322.18, or if he or she 60 possesses a learnerâs driver license pursuant to s. 322.1615 and 61 is under the direct supervision of a licensed driver. 62 (6)âThe owner or operator of a UTV must comply with all of 63 the following requirements and regulations: 64 (a)âObey traffic regulations enumerated in this chapter and 65 operate the UTV with due care. 66 (b)âProvide proof of ownership under chapter 317 upon 67 request of a law enforcement officer. 68 (c)âFulfill all insurance requirements pursuant to ss. 69 324.022 and 627.736. 70 (d)âEnsure that the UTV has the proper license plate 71 pursuant to s. 320.0847. 72 (e)âMaintain the registration certificate or a copy thereof 73 in the UTV pursuant to s. 320.0605. 74 (7)âA county or municipality may enact an ordinance 75 regarding UTV operation and equipment which is more restrictive 76 than the requirements enumerated in this section. 77 (8)âA county or municipality may prohibit the operation of 78 a UTV on any road or street under its jurisdiction if the 79 governing body of such county or municipality determines that 80 such prohibition is necessary in the interest of safety. 81 (9)âA violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic 82 infraction, punishable as a nonmoving violation, as provided in 83 chapter 318. 84 Section 2.âSection 320.0847, Florida Statutes, is amended 85 to read: 86 320.0847âMini truck, utility terrain vehicle, and low-speed 87 vehicle license plates.â 88 (1)âThe department shall issue a license plate to the owner 89 or lessee of any vehicle registered as a low-speed vehicle as 90 defined in s. 320.01, or a mini truck as defined in s. 320.01, 91 or a utility terrain vehicle as defined in s. 316.21275 upon 92 payment of the appropriate license taxes and fees prescribed in 93 s. 320.08. 94 (2)âThe license plate for a low-speed vehicle, or mini 95 truck, or utility terrain vehicle must shall comply with the 96 provisions of s. 320.06. 97 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.